Hawaii statutes.
§166-7 Applicants. Any person,
including a revocable living trust, partnership, corporation, limited liability
company, association, or an agricultural cooperative organized under chapter
421 at least seventy-five per cent of the trustees, partners, officers and
stockholders, or members of which qualify individually, may apply for an
agricultural park lease if the person, trustees, partners, officers and
stockholders, or members are eligible and qualified according to criteria set
forth in rules adopted by the board in conformance with section 166-9. [L 1986,
c 222, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 22, §3; am L 1990, c 52, §4; am L 1999, c 40, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next